Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-728
Kindergarten programs; required.

All school districts shall offer a kindergarten program.

Laws 1988, LB 1197, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-201.11;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 402;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 59.
January 1, 2019
Kindergarten, entrance requirements, see section 79-214.